Washington statutes.
RCW 18.122.010

Legislative intent.

The legislature takes note of the burgeoning number of bills proposed to regulate new health and health-related professions and occupations. The legislature further recognizes the number of allied health professions seeking independent practice. Potentially at least one hundred forty-five discrete health professions and occupations are recognized nationally, with at least two hundred fifty secondary job classifications. A uniform and streamlined credentialing process needs to be established to permit the department of health to administer the health professional regulatory programs in the most cost-effective, accountable, and uniform manner. The public interest will be served by establishing uniform administrative provisions for the regulated professions under the jurisdiction of the department of health regulated after July 26, 1987.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 306; 1987 c 150 s 61.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.